Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1059
Electrology; licensure required.

No person, group, company, limited liability company, or other entity shall engage in any of the following acts without being duly licensed as required by the Cosmetology, Electrology, Esthetics, Nail Technology, and Body Art Practice Act, unless specifically excepted by such act:

(1) To engage in or follow or to advertise or hold oneself out as engaging in or following any of the practices of electrology; or

(2) To engage in or advertise or hold oneself out as engaging in the teaching of any of the practices of electrology.

Laws 1995, LB 83, § 20;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 25;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-385.01;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 321.